Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1970.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1698.510 of Title 69, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The bridge on State Highway 18 about three and one-half (3 1/2)
miles south of Pawnee crossing over Camp Creek in Pawnee County
shall be designated as the “PV2 Earl Maggart Memorial Bridge”. The
Department of Transportation shall cause suitable permanent markers
bearing that name to be placed on the bridge.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON AERONAUTICS AND TRANSPORTATION
February 16, 2026 - DO PASS




SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1970 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)